Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Chapter 23. Virginia Electric Utility Regulation Act.
§ 56-585.6.
Universal service fee; Percentage of Income Payment Program and Fund.

The Commission shall, after notice and opportunity for hearing, initiate a proceeding to establish the rates, terms, and conditions of a non-bypassable universal service fee to fund the Percentage of Income Payment Program (PIPP). Such universal service
fee shall be allocated to retail electric customers of a Phase I and Phase II Utility on the basis of the amount of kilowatt-hours used and be established at such level to adequately address the PIPP’s objectives to (i) reduce
the energy burden of eligible participants by limiting electric bill payments directly to no more than six percent of the eligible participant’s annual household income if the household’s heating source is anything other than electricity,
and to no more than 10 percent of an eligible participant’s annual household income on electricity costs if the household’s primary heating source is electricity; (ii) reduce the amount of electricity used by the eligible participant’s
household through participation in weatherization or energy efficiency programs and energy conservation education programs; and (iii) reduce the amount of energy, regardless of primary heating source, used by the eligible participant’s
household through participation in weatherization or energy efficiency programs and energy conservation education programs. The annual total cost of any programs implemented pursuant to clauses (i), (ii), and (iii) shall not exceed
costs, including administrative costs, in the aggregate of (a) $25 million for any Phase I Utility or (b) $100 million for any Phase II Utility in any rate year in which such program costs are incurred.

The Commission shall determine the reasonable administrative costs for the investor-owned utility to collect the universal service fee and remit such funds to the Percentage of Income Payment Fund established in subsection E, and any other administrative
costs the investor-owned utility may incur in complying with the PIPP, and shall determine the proper recovery mechanism for such costs. A Phase I and Phase II Utility shall not be eligible to earn a rate of return on any equity
or costs incurred to comply with the program requirements or implementation. The Commission shall initiate proceedings to provide for an annual true-up of the universal service fee within 60 days of the commencement of the PIPP
and on an annual or semiannual basis thereafter. As part of any annual true-up case, each Phase I and Phase II Utility shall report to the Commission any data or forecasting required by the Commission regarding the participation
by PIPP participants in utility energy reduction programs.

The Department of Social Services (the Department), in consultation with, as it deems necessary, the Department of Housing and Community Development, shall adopt rules or establish guidelines for the adoption, implementation, and general administration
of the PIPP and the Percentage of Income Payment Fund established in subsection E, consistent with this section. Such rules or guidelines shall include exemptions for terms of program participation or energy use reduction as the
Department deems appropriate. The PIPP shall commence no later than one year after the Department publishes such rules or guidelines. Each Phase I and Phase II Utility shall cooperate with the requests of the Department in the
implementation and administration of the PIPP. The Commission shall promulgate any rules necessary to ensure that (i) funds collected from each utility’s universal service fee are directed to the Percentage of Income Payment Fund
and (ii) utilities receive adequate compensation from the Fund, on a timely basis, for all reasonable costs of the PIPP, including costs associated with bill payment credits for eligible customers.

In carrying out the PIPP’s objective of electricity usage reductions, PIPP-eligible customers may, to the extent reasonably possible, utilize existing energy efficiency or related programs approved by the Commission for a Phase I and Phase II Utility
and existing and available federal, state, local, or nonprofit programs. The Department may review the needs of PIPP-eligible customers and whether gaps remain in serving such customers that are not already served by existing and
available federal, state, local, or nonprofit programs to meet the energy reduction obligations of this section. The Department shall report the results of such analysis and review to the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor
and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor no later than November 1, 2022.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Percentage of Income Payment Fund, referred to in this section as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All funds collected
from each Phase I and Phase II Utility’s universal service fee shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining
in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely for the purposes of implementation and administration
of the PIPP, including any associated start-up costs. Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the Commissioner of the
Department of Social Services or by order of the Commission in conjunction with a true-up proceeding.

History.
2020, cc. 1193, 1194; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 308.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 4 provides: “That each investor-owned utility shall consult with the Clean Energy Advisory Board established by Chapter 554 of the Acts of Assembly of 2019 in how best to inform low-income customers of opportunities to
lower electric bills through access to solar energy.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 12 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall issue its final order in the Percentage of Income Payment Program (PIPP) proceeding established pursuant to § 56-585.6 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this
act, by December 31, 2020, provided that the non-bypassable universal service fee shall not be collected from customers of a Phase I or a Phase II Utility, as those terms are defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of
Virginia, as amended by this act, until such time as the PIPP is established. The Department of Housing and Community Development and the Department of Social Services shall convene a stakeholder working group and develop recommendations
regarding the implementation of PIPP. Such recommendations shall allow for a utility to reimburse the administrative costs of the PIPP, not to exceed $3 million, and shall be submitted to the Chairs of the House Committee on Labor
and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce and Labor by December 1, 2020.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1193 and 1194, cl. 13 provides: “That this bill shall be referred to as the Virginia Clean Economy Act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 308, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall issue an order providing for a non-bypassable universal service fee to be collected from customers of a Phase I or Phase II Utility, as those terms are defined
in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, in accordance with § 56-585.6 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, as soon as practicable following the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 308, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Social Services is authorized to access funds in the Percentage of Income Payment Fund, established in § 56-585.6 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, for the purposes
outlined in subsection E of § 56-585.6 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, as soon as such funds become available.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 308, cl. 4 provides: “That in the event the Percentage of Income Payment Program (PIPP), established pursuant to § 56-585.6 of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, commences prior to July 1, 2023, for a Phase II Utility,
as such term is defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1 of the Code of Virginia, the Department of Social Services (the Department) shall develop a memorandum of understanding, in a manner mutually agreeable to the Department and
to the Phase II Utility, to render payment on behalf of each PIPP-eligible customer to the Phase II Utility until July 1, 2023, in accordance with the terms of such memorandum of understanding.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 308, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A, inserted “primary” in clause (i), added clause (iii), and added the last sentence; in subsection B, inserted “established in subsection E” in the first sentence, and added
the third and fourth sentences; and added subsections C through E.

§ 56-585.7.
On-bill tariff program; electric cooperatives.

As used in this section:“Cooperative” means a utility consumer services cooperative.“Eligible customer” means a member-consumer receiving service from a cooperative that (i) has asked to participate in the cooperative’s on-bill tariff program and (ii)
has been determined by the cooperative to be eligible to participate in its on-bill tariff program.“Energy efficiency measures” means any installation, improvement, addition, or equipment approved by the cooperative for purpose
of its on-bill tariff program that has the primary purpose of improving the energy efficiency of the premises and reducing its consumption of energy, including heating and air conditioning systems, water heaters, weatherization,
insulation, window and door modifications, appliances, and automatic or Internet-connected energy control systems. “Energy efficiency measures” does not include energy conservation measures to improve the energy efficiency of (i)
premises constructed within five years prior to an eligible customer’s request to participate in an on-bill tariff program or (ii) premises that are under initial construction.“Energy savings charge” means the charge placed by
the cooperative on the monthly billing statement of an eligible customer or subsequent customers in order to recover the costs of the energy efficiency measures installed at the eligible customer’s premises.“On-bill tariff agreement”
means an agreement between an eligible customer and a cooperative that provides for the terms, conditions, payments, and costs, including financing or capital costs, of the installation of energy efficiency measures at a premises
to be paid by or through the cooperative and repaid by the eligible customer or subsequent customer at the same premises by means of an energy savings charge.“On-bill tariff program” means a voluntary tariff program that allows
eligible customers (i) to arrange through the cooperative for its provision and installation, including by its chosen vendors, of energy efficiency measures at the customer’s premises without an upfront payment and (ii) to pay
back over time the cost of the energy efficiency measures through an energy savings charge.“Program costs” means a participating cooperative’s (i) identified, projected, and actual costs to design, implement, and operate its on-bill
tariff program, including costs to request and evaluate vendor proposals and manage the vendors; (ii) administrative, labor, and marketing charges; (iii) costs of obtaining funds used by the cooperative to pay for the energy efficiency
measures; (iv) write-offs for unpaid energy savings charges after reasonable collection efforts; and (v) reasonable margin.

On or after January 1, 2021, notwithstanding any other provision of law, a cooperative may, without Commission approval, upon an affirmative resolution of its board of directors and without the requirement of any filing other than as required in this
subsection, propose, establish, and implement an on-bill tariff program for energy efficiency measures, provided that such program adheres to the provisions of this section. This regulated, tariffed program shall be reviewable
by the Commission at the cooperative’s next general rate proceeding. A cooperative shall recover the program costs through a new rate schedule established by this section or otherwise through its rates. A cooperative shall file
a copy of any such new rate schedule with the Commission for informational purposes.

At least 120 days prior to making an informational filing as described in subsection B, a cooperative shall conduct a stakeholder process to design the on-bill tariff program collaboratively with interested parties. Such stakeholder process shall be open
to the cooperative’s membership and invited guests and shall include an opportunity to participate for low-income and middle-income advocates, energy efficiency advocates, affordable housing advocates, and the staff of the Commission.
The stakeholder process shall examine and recommend, among other things, appropriate additional consumer safeguards for potential adoption by the cooperative, including oversight of third-party vendors and appropriate methods for
notifying customers that vendors are subject to the Virginia Consumer Protection Act (§ 59.1-196 et seq.). The stakeholder process shall allow for remote or electronic participation and may include multiple cooperatives or be coordinated,
convened, and facilitated by a group or association of cooperatives. The meetings of the stakeholders may be held anywhere in the Commonwealth. The cooperative shall include documentation concerning the stakeholder process in its
informational filing to the Commission.

A cooperative’s on-bill tariff program shall include criteria for selecting eligible customers; limits on the individual and aggregate amounts of energy efficiency measures for each eligible customer; limits on the overall amount available under the on-bill
tariff program; generally applicable repayment terms; and qualifications of potential vendors that will market or install energy efficiency measures. Multiple cooperatives may collaborate to create a similar structure for on-bill
tariff programs.

An on-bill tariff agreement shall:

Specify that the eligible customer or subsequent customers at the premises shall only be responsible for the payment of the energy savings charge upon satisfactory installation of the energy efficiency measures as set forth in their on-bill tariff agreement;

Specify that the cooperative may recover the costs, including financing or capital costs, of installing the energy efficiency measures at an eligible customer’s premises through the energy savings charge;

Provide for the inclusion of an energy savings charge that is stated as a separate line item on the eligible customer’s or subsequent customer’s utility bill;

Provide that an eligible customer shall enter into an on-bill tariff agreement to participate in the on-bill tariff program;

Provide that the cooperative may apply the energy savings charge to the meter or bill of subsequent customers at the premises and that the then-current eligible customer is required to notify the subsequent customer of the on-bill tariff agreement and
the energy savings charge;

Deem amounts due under the tariff to be amounts owed for regulated electric service and for which an eligible customer is subject to disconnection of service pursuant to the cooperative’s existing policies for disconnection;

Provide that any loan or financing interest rate or cost of capital, or their equivalent, that is provided to the eligible customer pursuant to an on-bill tariff agreement shall be less than prevailing market rates;

Provide that payments for energy-saving charges made by eligible and subsequent customers shall be retained by the cooperative and amounts credited against the appropriate category of program costs; and

Result in deemed savings that are reasonably projected, based on the customer’s electricity utilization and rates at the beginning of the term, to result in lower electric bills for the customer, and that allocate a portion of the gross cost savings resulting
from the energy efficiency measures to the eligible customer and the remaining portion to the cooperative to recover the program costs.

Customers having a grievance or complaints against an on-bill tariff program shall have recourse to the informal and formal procedures of the Commission.

History.
2020, c. 807.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2020 act having been § 56-585.5.

§ 56-586.
Emergency service provider.

On and after January 1, 2001, if any supplier fails to fulfill an obligation, resulting in the failure of retail electric energy to be delivered into the control area serving the supplier’s retail customer, the entity fulfilling the control area function,
or, if applicable, the regional transmission entity or other entity as designated by the Commission, shall be responsible for charging the defaulting supplier for the full cost of replacement energy, including the cost of energy, the
cost incurred by others as a result of the default, and the assessment of penalties as may be approved either by the Commission, to the extent not precluded by federal law, or by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission. The Commission,
as part of the rules established under § 56-587, shall determine the circumstances under which failures to deliver electricity will result in the revocation of the supplier’s license.

History.
1999, c. 411.

§ 56-586.1.
Electric energy emergencies.

As used in this section, “electric energy emergency” means an unplanned interruption in the generation or transmission of electricity resulting from a hurricane, ice storm, windstorm, earthquake or similar natural phenomena, or from a criminal act affecting
such generation or transmission, act of war or act of terrorism, which interruption is (i) of such severity that minimum levels of reliable service cannot be maintained using resources practicably obtainable from the market and
(ii) so imminently and substantially threatening to the health, safety or welfare of residents of this Commonwealth that immediate action of state government is necessary to prevent loss of life, protect the public health or safety,
and prevent unnecessary or avoidable damage to property.

The Governor is authorized, after finding that an electric energy emergency exists and that appropriate federal and state agencies and appropriate reliability councils cannot adequately address such emergency, to declare an electric energy emergency by
filing a written declaration with the Secretary of the Commonwealth. The declaration shall state the counties and cities or utility service areas of the Commonwealth in which the declaration is applicable, or its statewide application.
A declared electric energy emergency shall go into immediate effect upon filing and continue in effect for the period prescribed in the declaration, but not more than thirty days. At the end of the prescribed period, the Governor
may issue another declaration extending the emergency. The Governor shall terminate such declaration as soon as the basis for such declaration no longer exists.

During a declared electric energy emergency, the Governor is authorized, in compliance with guidelines of the Department of Emergency Services promulgated as provided in subsection G, to require any generator or any municipal electric utility that is
capable of generating but (i) is not generating or (ii) is not generating at its full potential during such declared electric emergency, to generate, dispatch or sell electricity from a facility that it operates within the Commonwealth,
to the Commonwealth for distribution within the areas of the Commonwealth designated in the declaration. The quantity of electricity required to be generated, dispatched or sold, and the duration of such requirements, shall be
as determined by the Governor to be necessary to alleviate the electric energy emergency hardship. The Commonwealth shall compensate an entity required to generate, dispatch, or sell electricity pursuant to this subsection, and
the operator of any transmission facilities over which the electricity is transmitted, in the manner provided in § 56-522, mutatis mutandis, unless otherwise provided by federal law. The Department of Environmental Quality, the
State Air Pollution Control Board, the State Water Control Board, and the Virginia Waste Management Board shall issue any temporary or emergency permit, order, or variance necessary to authorize any permit amendments or other changes
needed to meet the requirements imposed under this section and the Governor may petition the President to declare a regional energy emergency under 42 U.S.C. § 7410(f) as necessary to suspend enforcement of any provision of the
federal Clean Air Act. Any increased operation required during such declared emergency shall not be counted towards the number of hours of operation allowed during the year. No civil charges or penalties shall be imposed for any
violation that occurs as a result of actions taken that are necessary for the required generation, dispatch or sale during the declared electric energy emergency. The foregoing provisions shall apply to all actions the entity takes
in connection with such required generation, dispatch or sale during the period of the declared emergency.

During a declared electric energy emergency, the Governor may use the services, equipment, supplies, and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the Commonwealth, and of the political subdivisions thereof, to the maximum extent practicable
and necessary to meet the electric energy emergency. The officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies shall cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor upon request.

During a declared electric energy emergency, the Governor is authorized to request the Secretary of the United States Department of Energy to invoke section 202(C) of the Federal Power Act, 16 U.S.C. § 824a (1935).

The General Assembly is authorized by joint resolution to terminate any declaration of an electric energy emergency. The emergency shall be terminated at the time of filing of the joint resolution with the Secretary of the Commonwealth.

The Department of Emergency Services, in consultation with the Commission and the Secretary of Commerce and Trade, shall establish guidelines for the implementation of the Governor’s powers pursuant to subsection C that protect the public health and safety
and prevent unnecessary or avoidable damage to property with a minimum of economic disruption to generators, transmitters and distributors of electricity. Such guidelines shall:

Define various foreseeable levels of electric energy emergencies and specify appropriate measures to be taken for each type of electric energy emergency as necessary to protect the public health or safety or prevent unnecessary or avoidable damage to
property;

Prescribe appropriate response measures for each level of electric energy emergency; and

Equitably distribute the burdens and benefits resulting from the implementation of this section among other members of the affected class of persons within all geographic regions of the Commonwealth.

During a declared electric energy emergency, the attorney general may bring an action for injunctive or other appropriate relief in the Circuit Court of the City of Richmond to secure prompt compliance. The court may issue an ex parte temporary order
without notice that shall enforce the prohibitions, restrictions or actions that are necessary to secure compliance with the guideline, order or declaration.

During a declared electric energy emergency, no person shall intentionally violate any guideline adopted or declaration issued pursuant to this section. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.
2002, c. 609.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 56-587.
Licensure of retail electric energy suppliers and persons providing other competitive services.

As a condition of doing business in the Commonwealth, each person except a default service provider seeking to sell, offering to sell, or selling electric energy to any retail customer in the Commonwealth, on and after January 1, 2002, shall obtain a
license from the Commission to do so. A license shall not be required solely for the leasing or financing of property used in the sale of electricity to any retail customer in the Commonwealth.The license shall authorize that person
to engage in the activities authorized by such license until the license expires or is otherwise terminated, suspended or revoked.

As a condition of obtaining, retaining and renewing any license issued pursuant to this section, a person shall satisfy such reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements as may be specified by the Commission, which may include requirements that such
person (i) demonstrate, in a manner satisfactory to the Commission, financial responsibility; (ii) post a bond as deemed adequate by the Commission to ensure that financial responsibility; (iii) pay an annual license fee
to be determined by the Commission; and (iv) pay all taxes and fees lawfully imposed by the Commonwealth or by any municipality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth. In addition, as a condition of obtaining,
retaining and renewing any license pursuant to this section, a person shall satisfy such reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements as may be specified by the Commission, including but not limited to requirements that
such person demonstrate (i) technical capabilities as the Commission may deem appropriate; (ii) in the case of a person seeking to sell, offering to sell, or selling electric energy to any retail customer in the Commonwealth,
access to generation and generation reserves; and (iii) adherence to minimum market conduct standards. B. 1. As a condition of obtaining, retaining and renewing any license issued pursuant to this section, a person shall
satisfy such reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements as may be specified by the Commission, which may include requirements that such person (i) demonstrate, in a manner satisfactory to the Commission, financial responsibility;
(ii) post a bond as deemed adequate by the Commission to ensure that financial responsibility; (iii) pay an annual license fee to be determined by the Commission; and (iv) pay all taxes and fees lawfully imposed by the
Commonwealth or by any municipality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth. In addition, as a condition of obtaining, retaining and renewing any license pursuant to this section, a person shall satisfy such
reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements as may be specified by the Commission, including but not limited to requirements that such person demonstrate (i) technical capabilities as the Commission may deem appropriate;
(ii) in the case of a person seeking to sell, offering to sell, or selling electric energy to any retail customer in the Commonwealth, access to generation and generation reserves; and (iii) adherence to minimum market
conduct standards.

Any license issued by the Commission pursuant to this section to a person seeking to sell, offering to sell, or selling electric energy to any retail customer in the Commonwealth may be conditioned upon the licensee furnishing to the Commission prior
to the provision of electric energy to consumers proof of adequate access to generation and generation reserves.

The Commission:

Shall establish a reasonable period within which any retail customer may cancel, without penalty or cost, any contract entered into with any person licensed pursuant to this section; and

May adopt other rules and regulations governing the requirements for obtaining, retaining, and renewing a license issued pursuant to this section, and may, as appropriate, refuse to issue a license to, or suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license
of, any person that does not meet those requirements.

Each licensed supplier serving customers of a Phase I Utility, as defined in subdivision A 1 of § 56-585.1, shall file a report, verified by the president or the equivalent executive of such supplier, with the Commission by March 31 of each year that
contains:

Copies of all marketing materials and other public information conveyed to potential customers regarding the services offered by the supplier;

Usage and revenue data for the most recent year submitted to the U.S. Energy Information Administration;

Copies of all agreements entered into during the previous calendar year with such customers taking service under subdivision A 3 of § 56-577. Such agreements may be filed under seal, and if so will be afforded confidential treatment and will not be disclosed
beyond the Commission or its staff; and

A statement that the agreements submitted comply with the Commission’s Rules Governing Retail Access to Competitive Energy Services (20VAC5-312-10 et seq.).Failure to provide such report may be grounds for suspension or revocation of the supplier’s license
to sell retail electric energy within the Commonwealth.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

13.1-620

, a public service company may, through an affiliate or subsidiary, conduct one or more of the following businesses, even if such business is not related to or incidental to its stated business as a public service
company: (i) become licensed as a retail electric energy supplier pursuant to this section, or for purposes of participation in an approved pilot program encompassing retail customer choice of electric energy suppliers; (ii) become
licensed as an aggregator pursuant to § 56-588, or for purposes of participation in an approved pilot program encompassing retail customer choice of electric energy suppliers; or (iii) own, manage or control any plant or equipment
or any part of a plant or equipment used for the generation of electric energy.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2007, cc. 888, 933; 2019, c. 833.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991, in subsection A, inserted “except a default service provider” “(i)” and “or (ii) any service that, pursuant to § 56-581.1, may be provided by persons licensed to provide such service” and redesignated former subsection B
as present subdivision B 1, and inserted the language beginning “in the case of” and ending “customer in the Commonwealth” and, inserted the language beginning “to a person” and ending “customer in the Commonwealth” in subdivision
B 2, and substituted “any person” with “supplier” in subdivision C 1, and substituted “issued pursuant to this section” for “to supply electric energy to retail customers” in C 2, and in subsection D, inserted language beginning “(iii)
become licensed to furnish“ and ending “provide such service” and substituted “(iv)” for “(iii).”

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and deleted “or (ii) any service that, pursuant to § 56-581.1, may be provided by persons licensed to provide such service” following “January 1, 2002” in subsection A; and in subsection D, deleted
“become licensed to furnish any service that, pursuant to § 56-581.1, may be provided by persons licensed to provide such service; or (iv)” following “or (iii)” and made related changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 833, in subdivision C 2, deleted “The Commission” from the beginning; added subsection D; redesignated former subsection D as E; and made stylistic changes.

§ 56-588.
Licensing of aggregators.

As a condition of doing business in the Commonwealth, each person seeking to act as an aggregator within this Commonwealth on and after January 1, 2002, shall obtain a license from the Commission to do so. The license shall authorize that person to act
as an aggregator until the license expires or is otherwise terminated, suspended or revoked. Licensing pursuant to this section, however, shall not relieve any person seeking to act as a supplier of electric energy from their obligation
to obtain a license as a supplier pursuant to § 56-587.

As a condition of obtaining, retaining and renewing any license issued pursuant to this section, a person shall satisfy such reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements as may be specified by the Commission, which may include requirements that such
person (i) provide background information; (ii) demonstrate, in a manner satisfactory to the Commission, financial responsibility; (iii) post a bond as deemed adequate by the Commission to ensure that financial responsibility;
(iv) pay an annual license fee to be determined by the Commission; and (v) pay all taxes and fees lawfully imposed by the Commonwealth or by any municipality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth. In addition, as a
condition of obtaining, retaining and renewing any license pursuant to this section, a person shall satisfy such reasonable and nondiscriminatory requirements as may be specified by the Commission, including, but not limited to,
requirements that such person demonstrate technical capabilities as the Commission may deem appropriate. Any license issued by the Commission pursuant to this section may be conditioned upon the licensee, if acting as a supplier,
furnishing to the Commission prior to the provision of electricity to consumers proof of adequate access to generation and generation reserves.

In establishing aggregator licensing schemes and requirements applicable to the same, the Commission may differentiate between (i) those aggregators representing retail customers only, (ii) those aggregators representing suppliers only, and (iii) those
aggregators representing both retail customers and suppliers.

The Commission shall establish a reasonable period within which any retail customer may cancel, without penalty or cost, any contract entered into with an aggregator licensed pursuant to this section. D. 1. The Commission shall establish a reasonable
period within which any retail customer may cancel, without penalty or cost, any contract entered into with an aggregator licensed pursuant to this section.

The Commission may adopt other rules and regulations governing the requirements for obtaining, retaining, and renewing a license to aggregate electric energy to retail customers, and may, as appropriate, refuse to issue a license to, or suspend, revoke,
or refuse to renew the license of, any person that does not meet those requirements.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991 substituted “act as an aggregator” for “aggregate electric energy” in subsection A, and substituted “an aggregator” for “supplier” in subdivision D 1.

§ 56-589.
Municipal and state aggregation.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision A 3 of § 56-577, counties, cities, and towns (hereafter municipalities) and other political subdivisions of the Commonwealth may, at their election and upon authorization by majority votes of their governing bodies,
aggregate electrical energy and demand requirements for the purpose of negotiating the purchase of electrical energy requirements from any licensed supplier within this Commonwealth, as follows:

Any municipality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth may aggregate the electric energy load of residential, commercial, and industrial retail customers within its boundaries on an opt-in or opt-out basis.

Any municipality or other political subdivision of the Commonwealth may aggregate the electric energy load of its governmental buildings, facilities, and any other governmental operations requiring the consumption of electric energy. Aggregation pursuant
to this subdivision shall not require licensure pursuant to § 56-588.

Two or more municipalities or other political subdivisions within the Commonwealth may aggregate the electric energy load of their governmental buildings, facilities, and any other governmental operations requiring the consumption of electric energy.
Aggregation pursuant to this subdivision shall not require licensure pursuant to § 56-588 when such municipalities or other political subdivisions are acting jointly to negotiate or arrange for themselves agreements for
their energy needs directly with licensed suppliers or aggregators.Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the Commission’s development and implementation of pilot programs for opt-in, opt-out, or any other type of municipal
aggregation, as provided in § 56-577.

The Commonwealth, at its election, may aggregate the electric energy load of its governmental buildings, facilities, and any other government operations requiring the consumption of electric energy for the purpose of negotiating the purchase of electricity
from any licensed supplier within the Commonwealth. Aggregation pursuant to this subsection shall not require licensure pursuant to § 56-588.

Nothing in this section shall preclude municipalities from aggregating the electric energy load of their governmental buildings, facilities and any other governmental operations requiring the consumption of electric energy for the purpose of negotiating
rates and terms, and conditions of service from the electric utility certificated by the Commission to serve the territory in which such buildings, facilities and operations are located, provided, however, that no such electric
energy load shall be aggregated for this purpose unless all such buildings, facilities and operations to be aggregated are served by the same electric utility.

History.
1999, c. 411; 2000, c. 991; 2003, c. 795; 2004, c. 827; 2007, cc. 888, 933.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 991, added the last sentence in subdivisions A 2 and A 3, and in subsection B.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 795 added the concluding paragraph of subsection A.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 827, in subdivision A 1, in the first sentence, substituted “an opt-in or opt-out basis” for “a voluntary, opt-in basis in which each such customer must affirmatively select such municipality or other political subdivision as
its aggregator” at the end and deleted the last sentence, which formerly read: “The municipality or other political subdivision may not earn a profit but must recover the actual costs incurred in such aggregation”; and made minor stylistic
changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 888 and 933 are identical, and substituted “Subject to the provisions of subdivision A 3 of § 56-577” for “Counties” at the beginning of the introductory paragraph in subsection A; and added subsection C.